Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-275
Partner's executor or legal representative; exercise of powers.

If a partner who is an individual dies or a court of competent jurisdiction adjudges him or her to be incompetent to manage his or her person or his or her property, the partner's executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, personal representative, or other legal representative may exercise all the partner's rights for the purpose of settling his or her estate or administering his or her property, including any power the partner had to give an assignee the right to become a limited partner. If a partner is a corporation, limited liability company, trust, or other entity and is dissolved or terminated, the powers of that partner may be exercised by its legal representative or successor.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 43;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 405.